Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.095

Out-of-state massage therapist applicants.

A massage therapist applicant holding a license in another state or foreign jurisdiction may be granted a Washington license without examination, if, in the opinion of the board, the other state's or foreign jurisdiction's examination and educational requirements are substantially equivalent to Washington's. However, the applicant must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board a working knowledge of Washington law pertaining to the practice of massage. The applicant shall provide proof in a manner approved by the department that the examination and requirements are equivalent to Washington's.

[ 2016 c 41 s 9; 2012 c 137 s 13; 1987 c 443 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.

Effective date—1987 c 443 s 12: "Section 12 of this act shall take effect June 1, 1988." [ 1987 c 443 s 19.]